District of Columbia statutes.
47-4647

1029 Perry Street, N.E.; Lots 20 and 842, Square 3883.

[Not funded].

Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-342, § 2(b), 58 DCR 626

Section 4 of D.C. Law 18-342 provided: “Sec. 4. Applicability. This act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.”

The Budget Director of the Council of the District of Columbia has determined, as of February 15, 2012, that the fiscal effect of Law 18-342 has not been included in an approved budget and financial plan. Therefore, the provisions of this section, enacted by Law 18-342, are not in effect.